Utah statutes.
53B-2a-109.   Campus boards of directors -- Terms -- Quorum -- Chair--
Compensation.
(1) (a)  At the first meeting of a campus board of directors after July 1,
2009:
(i)  the representatives from the local school boards shall divide up their
positions so that approximately half of them serve for two-year terms and half
serve for four-year terms; and
(ii)  the representatives from business and industry employers shall divide up
their positions so that approximately half of them serve for two-year terms
and half serve for four-year terms.
(b)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(a), individuals appointed to a
campus board of directors shall serve four-year terms.
(2)  The original appointing authority shall fill any vacancies that occur on
the campus board of directors.
(3)  A majority of the campus board of directors is a quorum.
(4)  A campus board of directors shall elect a chair from its membership.
(5)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's
service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:
(a)  Section 63A-3-106;
(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and
(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
(6) (a)  A campus board of directors may enact bylaws for its own government,
including provision for regular meetings, that are in accordance with the
policies of the Utah College of Applied Technology.
(b) (i)  The campus board of directors may provide for an executive committee
in its bylaws.
(ii)  If established, the committee shall have the full authority of the
campus board of directors to act upon routine matters during the interim
between board meetings.
(iii)  The committee may act on nonroutine matters only under extraordinary
and emergency circumstances.
(iv)  The committee shall report its activities to the campus board of
directors at its next regular meeting following the action.
(7)  A campus board of directors may establish advisory committees.
